Maryland, session 2025, HB1301.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–101.
– 1 –

Ch. 612 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Facility” means a hospital or nursing facility including an intermediate care
facility, skilled nursing facility, comprehensive care facility, or extended care facility.
(h) “Program” means the Maryland Medical Assistance Program.
(K) “SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL” MEANS A FACILITY IN THE STATE
THAT PROVIDES NONACUTE MEDICAL, REHABILITATION, THERAPY, AND
PALLIATIVE SERVICES TO INDIVIDUALS:
(1) UNDER THE AGE OF 22 YEARS; OR
(2) WHO ARE AT LEAST 2 YEARS OLD AND UNDER THE AGE OF 23
YEARS AND HAVE CO–OCCURRING PHYSICAL AND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
CONDITIONS.
[(k)] (L) “Specialty mental health services” means any mental health services
other than primary mental health services.
[(l)] (M) “Validated home blood pressure monitor” means a blood pressure
measurement device that has been validated for accuracy and is listed in the U.S. Blood
Pressure Validated Device Listing.
15–102.3.
(M) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2026, THE PROVISIONS OF § 15–861 OF THE
INSURANCE ARTICLE APPLY TO MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS IN THE SAME
MANNER THAT THEY APPLY TO CARRIERS.
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:
(xxiii) Beginning on July 1, 2025, shall provide, subject to the
limitations of the State budget, and as permitted by federal law, coverage for biomarker
testing in accordance with § 15–859 of the Insurance Article; [and]
(xxiv) Beginning on January 1, 2025, shall provide coverage for
prostheses in accordance with § 15–844 of the Insurance Article; AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 612
(XXV) BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2026, SHALL PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR A TRANSFER TO A SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 15–861 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
15–157.
THE PROGRAM AND THE MARYLAND CHILDREN’S HEALTH PROGRAM MAY
NOT REQUIRE PRIOR AUTHORIZATION FOR A TRANSFER TO A SPECIAL PEDIATRIC
HOSPITAL.
Article – Insurance
15–861.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 15–101 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT REQUIRE PRIOR
AUTHORIZATION FOR A TRANSFER TO A SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –